Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.020

Grant program—Funding.

(1) The department of commerce is authorized to distribute funds that have been allocated to the grant program that it administers for serving victims of sexual assault.

(2) Activities that can be funded through this grant program are limited to those that:

(a) Provide effective services to victims of sexual assault;

(b) Increase access to and availability of services for victims of sexual assault, particularly if from underserved populations; and

(c) Create or build on efforts by existing community programs, coordinate those efforts, or develop cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make the most effective use of resources to provide treatment services to these victims.

(3) Funding for core, specialized, and underserved populations services, as defined in RCW 70.125.030, must be distributed through a funding formula to those applicants that emphasize providing stable, victim-centered sexual assault services and possess the qualifications to provide those services.

(4) The department of commerce shall ensure that grant recipients assist victims to utilize private insurance and crime victims' compensation benefits first before grant funds are used for therapy services.

[ 2012 c 29 s 3; 1996 c 123 s 3; 1995 c 399 s 113; 1990 c 3 s 1203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 123: See note following RCW 43.280.010.